src/morphology/stems/adjectives-oahpa.lexc
LEXICON Adjective  !!= !!@CODE@
aejlies+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aejl ies_IES_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
bahhas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bahha s_Ø_ODD ; !TT tidl. s_S
beagkoes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:beagko es_ES_ODDhk ; ! LA
beetnegapts:beetnegapt s_H_EVENNOCOMP ;
båantas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:båantas ø_Ø_ODD ; !båantahkåbpoe, båantahkommes
båantoes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:båant oes_OES_ODDahk ;
damtoes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:damt oes_OES_ODDas ;
dåsmoes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dåsm oes_OES_ODD ;
eejhtegapts:eejhtegapt s_H_EVENNOCOMP ;
fahkes:fahke s_S_ODDNOCOMP ;
gaarhtijes:gaarhtij ATTR_es_s ; !LA
gabtehaartege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth:gabte#haarteg Cs_CS_ODDNOCOMP ;
golmenlïhtsen:golmenlïhtsen ø_Ø_ODD ;
guelehts:guelieht hts_HTS_ODDhtCOMP ;
gåesties:gåest ies_(ehke)_IE_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN ;
hamhpas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:hamhpa s_S_Ø_ODD ;
hearhkoes:hearhkoe s_S_Ø_ODD ;
heelege:heeleg Ce_CE_ODD ;
hiejjehts:hiejjieht hts_HTS_ODD ; ! COMP:IE
hiejjies:hiejj ies_IES_IE_EVEN ;
instabijle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:in^stab IJLE_LOAN_A ;
jaahkoles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jaahkol les_LES_ODD ;
jakngehtje:jakngehtj Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP ; !attr=pred:jakngehtje
jaksoes:jaks oes_OES_ODD ; ! LA jaksoesåbpoe i corp
jeagkijes:jeagkij ATTR_es_s ;
jihtseles:jihtsiel Ces_CES_ODD ; !jihtsedh = VI= e(3)-st.
jissehts:jissieht hts_HTS_ODDhtCOMP ; ! VED COMP: IE
joekehth:joekeht hth_HTH_ODD ;
jupmeles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jupmiel Ces_CES_ODDNOCOMP ; !jupmielasse = ie-st.
jïegke:jïegk ø_S_ODDEVEN ; !jïegkesåbpoe ! e(1)-st.
kassaabele:kass AABELE ;
klåadtah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:klåadt ah_AH_ODD ;
kompatijbele:kompat IJBELE ;
kruepies:kruep ies_(ehke)_IES_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN ; !kruepebe, kruepemes
kåvrehts:kåvreht Cs_CS_ODDNOCOMP ; !XXX check
laemies+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:laem ies_IES_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
lovve:lovve ø_S_ODD ; ! LA
luvkeds:luvkied Cs_CS_ODD ; ! COMP:IE luvkiedabpa
låabpeds:låabped Cs_CS_CE_ODD ;
låapsoes:låaps oes_OES_ODDahk ; !- låapsahkåbpoe oe-a
læjnoes:læjnoe s_S_ODD ;
maskas:mask as_AS_ODDNOCOMP ;
mavvas:mavv as_AS_ODD ; !LA
minngeles:minngele s_S_ODDNOCOMP ;
måasoes:måas oes_OES_ODDNOCOMP ; !
måskas:måsk as_AS_ODDNOCOMP ;
måskoes:måsk oes_OES_ODDNOCOMP ;
nannas:nann as_AS_EVEN ;
nielehts:nieleht hts_HTS_ODD ; !nielehtsåbpoe ( (nealan)
nievries:nievr ies_IES_IE_EVEN ;
njamhkan:njamhk an_AN_ODDNOCOMP ; !njamhkakåbpoe
njoetske:njoetsk ø_S_ODDEVEN ; !njoetskebe, njoetskemes, njoetskesåbpoe, njoetskesommes ! e(1)-st.
njåamkehtje:njåamkehtj Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
nænnas:nænn as_AS_EVEN ; !'OE' eller 'A'
ovluhpehts:ov^luhpieht hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;
pliejhkies+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:pliejhk ies_(ehke)_IES_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN ;
presenijle:presen IJLE_LOAN_A ;
profitaabele:profit AABELE ;
reversijbele:revers IJBELE ;
rovnegs+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth:rovnigk Cs_CS_ODD ;
rudtjege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:rudtj ege_EGE_ODDEVEN ; !EGE= EVEN OD ODD COMP : rudtjebe, rudtjegåbpoe
råevhnjeds:råevhnjied Cs_CS_CE_ODD ; ! ! COMP:IE 'råevhnjiedåbpoe'
samhtje ø_S_ODD ; ! Attr=samhtje, Pred=samhtjes: samhtjesåbpoe ! e(1)-st. ! LA -> e_ES_ODDEVEN  ?
sjeavehth:sjeaveht hth_HTH_ODD ;
skaanjkah:skaanjk ah_AH_ODD ;
skaejlehke:skaejlehk Ce_CE_ODD ;
slahtjan:slahtj an_AN_ODDNOCOMP ; !slahtjakåbpoe
snaehpies:snaehp ies_IE_EVENNOCOMP ; !snaebpie= adverbial
striehkies:striehk ies_(ehke)_IE_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN ;
subtijle:subt IJLE_LOAN_A ;
sudties:sudt ies_IES_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
svalkoes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:svalk oes_OES_ODDas ;
sååltehks:sååltiehk s_E_ODD ;
tjaekeres+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjaekier Ces_CES_ODD ; ! VED COMP:IE tjaekiedåbpoe
tjeakas:tjeak as_AS_ODD ; ! LMM bare attr
tjijts:tjijt s_S_ODD ; !COMP:tjijtsåbpoe
tsåekies:tsåek ies_(ehke)_IE_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN ; !no 3-syll paradigm
tyjpeles:tyjpel les_LES_ODD ; !Typisk
vaaneraedties:vaane#raedt ies_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
vaapsijes:vaapsij ATTR_es_s ;
vihties:viht ies_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
vijdies:vijd ies_IES_IE_EVEN ;
vijsies+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vijs ies_(ehke)_IES_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN ;
vuesvies:vuesvi es_ES_ODDhk ; ! vuesviehkåbpoe
vyljehks+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vyljehk s_E_ODD ; ! tidlegare hks_hke_HKS_HKE_ODD!-> 'villig' -
åhtas:åht as_AS_EVEN ; ! LMM: as attr.
